California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 as conservator.Clerk of the Superior Courtby Deputy(b) Subject to a request for a court hearing or jury trial, the judge may, on his or her own motion, accept or reject the conservator’s petition.

If the conservator does not petition to reestablish conservatorship at or before the termination of the one-year period, the court shall issue a decree
 terminating conservatorship. The decree shall be delivered to the conservator and his or her conservatee pursuant to Section 1215 of the Probate Code and shall be accompanied by a statement of California law as set forth in Section 5368.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 148.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5363.

In the event the conservator continues in good faith to act within the powers granted him in the original decree of conservatorship beyond the one-year period, he may petition for and shall be granted a decree ratifying his acts as conservator beyond the one-year period. The decree shall provide for a retroactive appointment of the conservator to provide continuity of authority in those cases where the conservator did not apply in time for reappointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5364.

(a) At any time, the conservatee may petition the superior court for a rehearing as to their status as a conservatee. However, after the filing of the first petition for rehearing pursuant to this section, no further petition for rehearing shall be submitted for a period of six months. If the conservatorship is terminated pursuant to this section, the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5 of the Elections Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 15) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 807, Sec. 16.   (AB 2841)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5365.

A hearing shall be held on all petitions under this chapter within 30 days of the date of the petition. The court shall appoint the public defender or other attorney for the conservatee or proposed conservatee within five days after the date of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 574.)
-------------------------------------------

5365.1.

The conservatee or proposed conservatee may, upon advice of counsel, waive the presence at any hearing under this chapter of the physician or other professional person who recommended conservatorship pursuant to Section 5352 and of the physician providing evaluation or intensive treatment. In the event of such a waiver, such physician and professional persons shall not be required to be present at the hearing if it is stipulated that the recommendation and records of such physician or other professional person concerning the mental condition and treatment of the conservatee or proposed conservatee will be received in evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1162.)
-------------------------------------------

5366.1.

(a) Any person detained as of June 30, 1969, under court commitment, in a private institution, a county psychiatric hospital, facility of the Veterans Administration, or other agency of the United States government, community mental health service, or detained in a state hospital or facility of the Veterans Administration upon application of a local health officer, pursuant to former Section 5567 or Sections 6000 to 6019, inclusive, as they read immediately preceding July 1, 1969, may be detained, after January 1, 1972, for a period no longer than 180 days, except as provided in this section.

(b) Any person detained pursuant to this section on the effective date of this section shall be evaluated by the facility designated
 by the county and approved by the State Department of Health Care Services pursuant to Section 5150 as a facility for 72-hour treatment and evaluation. The evaluation shall be made at the request of the person in charge of the institution in which the person is detained. If in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility or his or her designee, the evaluation of the person can be made by the professional person or his or her designee at the institution in which the person is detained, the person shall not be required to be evaluated at the evaluation and treatment facility, but shall be evaluated at the institution where he or she is detained, or other place to determine if the person is a danger to others, himself or herself, or gravely disabled as a result of mental disorder.

(c) Any person evaluated under this section shall be released from the institution in which he or she is detained
 immediately upon completion of the evaluation if in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the evaluation and treatment facility, or his or her designee, the person evaluated is not a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled as a result of mental disorder, unless the person agrees voluntarily to remain in the institution in which he or she has been detained.

(d) If in the opinion of the professional person in charge of the facility or his or her designee, the person evaluated requires intensive treatment or recommendation for conservatorship, the professional person or his or her designee shall proceed under Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) of Chapter 2, or under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350), of Part 1 of Division 5.

(e) If it is determined from the evaluation that the person is gravely disabled and a recommendation for
 conservatorship is made, and if the petition for conservatorship for the person is not filed by June 30, 1972, the court commitment or detention under a local health officer application for the person shall terminate and the patient shall be released unless he or she agrees to accept treatment on a voluntary basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 23, Sec. 37.   (AB 82)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5367.

Conservatorship established under this chapter shall supersede any commitment under former provisions of this code relating to inebriates or the mentally ill.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

5368.

A person who is no longer a conservatee shall not be presumed to be incompetent by virtue of his having been a conservatee under the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

5369.

When a conservatee who has criminal charges pending against him and has been found mentally incompetent under Section 1370 of the Penal Code recovers his mental competence, the conservator shall certify that fact to the court, sheriff, and district attorney of the county in which the criminal charges are pending and to the defendant’s attorney of record.

The court shall order the sheriff to immediately return the defendant to the court in which the criminal charges are pending. Within two judicial days of the defendant’s return, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether the defendant is entitled to be admitted to bail or
 released upon his own recognizance pending conclusion of criminal proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1511.)
-------------------------------------------

5370.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a conservatorship proceeding may be initiated pursuant to this chapter for any person who has been charged with an offense, regardless of whether action is pending or has been initiated pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1511.)
-------------------------------------------

5370.1.

The court in which a petition to establish a conservatorship is filed may appoint the county counsel or a private attorney to represent a private conservator in all proceedings connected with the conservatorship, if it appears that the conservator has insufficient funds to obtain the services of a private attorney. Such appointments of the county counsel, however, may be made only if the board of supervisors have, by ordinance or resolution, authorized the county counsel to accept them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 415, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5370.2.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Health Care Services shall contract with a single nonprofit agency that meets the criteria specified in subdivision (b) of Section 5510 to conduct the activities specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive. These two state departments shall enter into a memorandum of understanding to ensure the effective management of the contract and the required activities affecting county patients’ rights programs:

(1) Provide patients’ rights advocacy services for, and conduct investigations of alleged or suspected abuse and neglect of, including deaths of, persons with mental disabilities residing in state
 hospitals.

(2) Investigate and take action as appropriate and necessary to resolve complaints from or concerning recipients of mental health services residing in licensed health or community care facilities regarding abuse, and unreasonable denial, or punitive withholding of rights guaranteed under this division that cannot be resolved by county patients’ rights advocates.

(3) Provide consultation, technical assistance, and support to county patients’ rights advocates in accordance with their duties under Section 5520.

(4) Conduct program review of patients’ rights programs.

(5) Make patients’ rights advocacy training materials readily accessible to all
 county patients’ rights advocates online. The training materials shall include, but are not limited to, the topics described in Section 5512.

(b) The services shall be provided in coordination with the appropriate mental health patients’ rights advocates.

(c) (1) The contractor shall develop a plan to provide patients’ rights advocacy services for, and conduct investigations of alleged or suspected abuse and neglect of, including the deaths of, persons with mental disabilities residing in state hospitals.

(2) The contractor shall develop the plan in consultation with the statewide organization of mental health patients’ rights advocates, the statewide organization of mental health clients, and the
 statewide organization of family members of persons with mental disabilities, and the statewide organization of county mental health directors.

(3) In order to ensure that persons with mental disabilities have access to high quality advocacy services, the contractor shall establish a grievance procedure and shall advise persons receiving services under the contract of the availability of other advocacy services, including services provided by the protection and advocacy agency specified in Section 4901 and the county patients’ rights advocates specified in Section 5520.

(d) This section does not restrict or limit the authority of the department to conduct the reviews and investigations it deems necessary for personnel, criminal, and litigation purposes.

(e) The State Department of State Hospitals and the State Department of Health Care Services shall jointly contract on a multiyear basis for a contract term of up to five years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 237, Sec. 2.   (AB 2316)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5371.

No person upon whom a duty is placed to evaluate, or who, in fact, does evaluate a conservatee for any purpose under this chapter shall have a financial or other beneficial interest in the facility where the conservatee is to be, or has been placed.

Conservatorship investigation and administration shall be conducted independently from any person or agency which provides mental health treatment for conservatees, if it has been demonstrated that the existing arrangement creates a conflict of interest between the treatment needs of the conservatee and the investigation or administration of the conservatorship. The
 person or agency responsible for the mental health treatment of conservatees shall execute a written agreement or protocol with the conservatorship investigator and administrator for the provision of services to conservatees. The agreement or protocol shall specify the responsibilities of each person or agency who is a party to the agreement or protocol, and shall specify a procedure to resolve disputes or conflicts of interest between agencies or persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 335, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5372.

(a) The provisions of Section 1051 of the Probate Code shall apply to conservatorships established pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The Judicial Council shall, on or before January 1, 2008, adopt a rule of court to implement this section.

(c) Subdivision (a) of this section shall become operative on January 1, 2008.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 492, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Administration [5400. - 5405.]

5400.

(a) The Director of Health Care Services shall administer this part and shall adopt rules, regulations, and standards as necessary. In developing rules, regulations, and standards, the Director of Health Care Services shall consult with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, and the office of the Attorney General. Adoption of these standards, rules, and regulations shall require approval by the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California by majority vote of those present at an official session.

(b) Wherever feasible and appropriate, rules, regulations, and standards adopted under this
 part shall correspond to comparable rules, regulations, and standards adopted under the
 Bronzan-McCorquodale Act. These corresponding rules, regulations, and standards shall include qualifications for professional personnel.

(c) Regulations adopted pursuant to this part may provide standards for services for persons with chronic alcoholism that differ from the standards for services for persons with mental health disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 511, Sec. 3.   (AB 1688)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5400.1.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall issue guidance regarding Medi-Cal reimbursement for covered Medi-Cal services provided to an individual receiving involuntary treatment for a severe substance use disorder pursuant to this part. This guidance shall be consistent with Medi-Cal reimbursement for covered Medi-Cal services provided to an individual receiving involuntary treatment for a mental health disorder pursuant to this part, to the extent that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not
 jeopardized and all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 644, Sec. 6.   (SB 1238)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall collect data quarterly and publish, on or before May 1 of each year, a report including quantitative, deidentified information concerning the operation of this division. The report shall include an evaluation of the effectiveness of achieving the legislative intent of this part pursuant to Section 5001. Based on information that is available from each county, the report shall include all of the following information:

(1) The number of persons in designated and approved facilities admitted or detained for 72-hour evaluation and treatment, admitted for 14-day and 30-day periods of intensive treatment, and admitted for 180-day
 postcertification intensive treatment in each county.

(2) The number of persons transferred to mental health facilities pursuant to Section 4011.6 of the Penal Code in each county.

(3) The number of persons for whom temporary conservatorships are established in each county.

(4) The number of persons for whom conservatorships are established in each county.

(5) The number of persons admitted or detained either once, between two and five times, between six and eight times, and greater than eight times for each type of detention, including 72-hour evaluation and treatment, 14-day and 30-day periods of intensive treatment, and 180-day postcertification intensive treatment.

(6) The clinical outcomes for individuals identified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive.

(7) The services provided or offered to individuals identified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive. Data pertaining to services provided or offered to individuals placed on each type of hold shall include, but not be limited to, assessment, evaluation, medication treatment, crisis intervention, and psychiatric and psychological treatment services. Data pertaining to services shall specify the payer information or funding used to pay for services.

(8) The waiting periods for individuals prior to receiving an evaluation in a designated and approved facility pursuant to Section 5150 or 5151 and waiting periods for individuals prior to receiving treatment
 services in a designated facility, including the reasons for waiting periods. The waiting period shall be calculated from the date and time when the hold began and end on the date and time when the individual received an evaluation or received evaluation and treatment services in a designated facility.

(9) If the source of admission is an emergency department, the date and time of service and release from emergency care.

(10) Demographic data of those receiving care, including age, sex, gender identity, race, ethnicity, primary language, sexual orientation, veteran status, and housing status, to the extent those data are available.

(11) The number of all county-contracted beds.

(12) The number and outcomes of all of the following:

(A) The certification review hearings held pursuant to Section 5256.

(B) The petitions for writs of habeas corpus filed pursuant to Section 5275.

(C) The judicial review hearings held pursuant to Section 5276.

(D) The petitions for capacity hearings filed pursuant to Section 5332.

(E) The capacity hearings held pursuant to Section 5334 in each superior court.

(13) Analysis and evaluation of the efficacy of mental health assessments, detentions, treatments, and supportive
 services provided both under this part and subsequent to release.

(14) Recommendations for improving mental health assessments, detentions, treatments, and supportive services provided under this part and subsequent to release.

(15) An assessment of the disproportionate use of detentions and conservatorships on various groups, including an assessment of use by the race, ethnicity, gender identity, age group, veteran status, housing status, and Medi-Cal enrollment status of detained and conserved persons. This assessment shall evaluate disproportionate use at the county, regional, and state levels.

(16) An explanation for the absence of any data required pursuant to this section that are not included in the report.

(17) Beginning with the report due May 1, 2025, the report shall also include the progress that has been made on implementing recommendations from prior reports issued under this subdivision.

(18) Beginning with the report due May 1, 2024, the number of persons admitted or detained, including 72-hour evaluations and treatment, 14-day and 30-day periods of intensive treatment, and 180-day postcertification intensive treatment, for each of the following conditions:

(A) Danger to self.

(B) Danger to others.

(C) Grave disability due to a mental health disorder.

(D) Grave disability due to a severe substance use disorder.

(E) Grave disability due to both a mental health disorder and a severe substance use disorder.

(19) (A) Beginning with the report due May 1, 2026, all of the information reported by facilities to county behavioral health directors pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 5336.

(B) This paragraph shall be inoperative on January 1, 2030.

(b) (1) (A) Each county behavioral health director shall provide accurate and complete data to the department in a form and manner, and in accordance with timelines, prescribed by the department.

(B) County behavioral health directors shall provide the data specified in paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (a), and any other information, records, and reports that the department deems necessary for the purposes of this section.

(C) Data shall be submitted on a quarterly basis, or more frequently, as required by the department. The department shall not have access to patient name identifiers.

(2) (A) Each designated and approved facility that admits, detains, or provides services to
 persons pursuant to this part and Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 5585) and each other entity involved in implementing Section 5150 shall collect and provide accurate and complete data to the county behavioral health director in the county in which they operate to meet the reporting obligations specified in paragraphs (1) to (11), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and any other information, records, and reports that the county or the department deems necessary for the purposes of this section.

(B) A county may establish policies and procedures for this paragraph to ensure compliance with the requirements of this section. These facilities and entities shall collect and report data to the county behavioral health director consistent with the county’s policies and procedures, if established.

(C) Data shall be submitted to the county behavioral health director on a quarterly basis, or more frequently, as required by the county.

(3) A county behavioral health director shall provide the accurate and complete data it receives pursuant to paragraph (2) to the department pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) All data submitted to the department by each county behavioral health director shall be transmitted in a secure manner in compliance with all applicable state and federal requirements, including, but not limited to, Section 164.312 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) Information published pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not contain data that may lead to the identification of patients
 receiving services under this division and shall contain statistical data only. Data published by the department shall be deidentified in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 164.514 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(d) The Judicial Council shall provide the department, by October 1 of each year, with data from each superior court to complete the report described in this section, including the number and outcomes of certification review hearings held pursuant to Section 5256, petitions for writs of habeas corpus filed pursuant to Section 5275, judicial review hearings held pursuant to Section 5276, petitions for capacity hearings filed pursuant to Section 5332, and capacity hearings held pursuant to Section 5334 in each superior court. The department shall not have access to patient name identifiers.

(e) The department shall make the report publicly available on the department’s internet website.

(f) (1) The department may impose a plan of correction or assess civil money penalties, pursuant to paragraph (3), or both, against a designated and approved facility that fails to submit data on a timely basis or as otherwise required by this section.

(2) The department may impose a plan of correction or assess civil money penalties, pursuant to paragraph (3), or both, against a county that fails to submit data on a timely basis or as otherwise required by this section.

(3) The department may assess civil money penalties against a designated and
 approved facility or county in the amount of fifty dollars ($50) per day from the date specified in the notice to impose civil money penalties from the department.

(4) (A) A designated and approved facility or county may submit an informal written appeal of a civil money penalty to the department within 30 calendar days of the date of issuance of a notice to impose civil money penalties.

(B) The designated and approved facility or county shall include any supporting documentation and explain any mitigating circumstances.

(C) The department shall make a determination on the appeal within 60 calendar days of receipt of the informal written appeal.

(5) (A) A designated and approved facility or county may request a formal hearing within 30 calendar days following the issuance of the department’s final determination on the appeal pursuant to paragraph (4).

(B) All hearings to review the imposition of civil money penalties shall be held pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 100171 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Civil money penalties imposed upon a designated and approved facility or county shall continue to accrue until the effective date of the final decision of the department.

(g) (1) The Lanterman-Petris-Short Act Data and Reporting Oversight Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(2) The Lanterman-Petris-Short Act Data and Reporting Oversight Fund shall be administered by the State Department of Health Care Services.

(3) Civil money penalties assessed and collected pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be deposited into this fund.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys deposited in the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act Data and Reporting Oversight Fund shall be continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the State Department of Health Care Services for the purposes of funding its oversight activities and administrative costs associated with implementing this section.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act Data and Reporting Oversight Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(h) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of information notices, provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(i) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of administering or implementing the requirements of
 this section. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 643, Sec. 5.   (SB 1184)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.2.

The Director of State Hospitals shall develop a master plan for the utilization of state hospital facilities identifying levels of care. The level of care shall be either general acute care, skilled nursing care, subacute, intermediate care, or residential care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 133.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5402.5.

(a) On or before December 1, 2023, the State Department of Health Care Services shall convene a stakeholder group to create a model care coordination plan to be followed when discharging those held under temporary holds pursuant to Section 5152 or a conservatorship. The stakeholder group shall include, at a minimum, the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the California Chapter of the American College of Emergency Physicians, the California Hospital Association, Medi-Cal managed care plans, private insurance plans, other
 organizations representing the various facilities where individuals may be detained under temporary holds or a conservatorship, other appropriate entities or agencies as determined by the department, and advocacy organizations representing those who have been involuntarily detained or conserved, as well as individuals who have been detained or conserved.

(b) The model care coordination plan and process shall outline who will be on the care team and how the communication will occur to coordinate care. It shall specify that the care coordination is a shared responsibility between, at a minimum, the county, the facility, and the health care payer, if different from the county. The model care coordination plan shall, at a minimum, also address the following:

(1) The roles of each entity to ensure continuity of services and care for all individuals exiting involuntary holds, including how referrals will be made and appointments will be scheduled pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 5008. This shall include all of the following:

(A) Identification of county resources, programs, and contact information to facilitate referrals for individuals exiting involuntary holds or intensive treatment, including, but not limited to, suicide prevention, substance use disorder treatment, Medi-Cal Enhanced Care Management, Full Service Partnerships, assisted outpatient treatment, early psychosis intervention services, and resources published pursuant to Section 5013.

(B) Hospital aftercare and discharge planning processes pursuant to
 Sections 1262 and 1262.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Hospital policies and procedures in compliance with nationally accepted accreditation standards to reduce the risk of suicide, including, but not limited to, screening and assessing patients for suicidal ideation and suicidal risk, developing a safety plan with patients at risk for suicide, and following written policies and procedures addressing the care, counseling, and followup care at discharge for patients at risk for suicide.

(2) A requirement that the care coordination plan for an individual exiting a temporary hold or a conservatorship include a detailed plan that includes a scheduled first appointment with
 the health plan, the mental health plan, a primary care provider, or another appropriate provider to whom the person has been referred.

(3) County procedures and contact information for the availability of designated persons for the purpose of conducting an assessment pursuant to Section 5150. Designated individuals shall be available on a 24-hours-per-day, seven-days-per-week basis in order to ensure that individuals are released from the hold as soon as possible after it is determined they no longer require detention. In no event may the individual be involuntarily held beyond when they would otherwise qualify for release.

(4) County procedures for facilities and professional persons to request designation to perform assessments and evaluations, pursuant
 to Sections 5151 and 5152.

(5) County procedures and contact information facilities are required to use to obtain an assessment and evaluation of an individual, pursuant to Sections 5151 and 5152.

(6) Defined expectations for information sharing, including notification of and transmittal of applications pursuant to Section 5150 and plans to periodically convene to identify and resolve challenges.

(c) (1) Each county mental health department shall ensure that a care coordination plan that ensures continuity of services and care in the community for all individuals exiting holds or a conservatorship pursuant to this part is established.

(2) All facilities designated by the counties for evaluation and treatment under this part shall implement the model care coordination plan on or before August 1, 2024.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement Section 5402.5 by means of
 all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 867, Sec. 5.   (AB 2242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5403.

(a) From July 1, 1991 to June 30, 1993, inclusive, regulations promulgated by the department shall not be subject to the approval of the California Conference of Local Mental Health Directors. The impact of this subdivision on regulatory timing shall be included in the department’s report to the Legislature on September 30, 1992. 

(b) The department shall continue to involve the conference in the development of all regulations which affect local mental health programs prior to the promulgation of those regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 34.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5404.

(a) Counties may designate facilities to provide evaluation and treatment in accordance with Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150) of Chapter 2 of this part, and intensive treatment in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 5270.10), inclusive, and Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 2 of this part. Designated facilities shall meet those designation requirements duly established by the State Department of Health Care Services. Subject to requirements duly established by the State Department of Health Care Services, counties may designate appropriate facilities, that are not hospitals or clinics.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall approve county designation of facilities
 to provide the types of treatment described in subdivision (a).

(c) All regulations relating to the approval of facilities designated by the county in accordance with this part, heretofore adopted by the State Department of Mental Health, or a successor, shall remain in effect and shall be fully enforceable by the State Department of Health Care Services with respect to the designation of any facility or program required to be approved to provide the types of treatment described in subdivision (a), unless and until readopted, amended, or repealed by the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall succeed to and be vested with all duties, powers, purposes, functions, responsibilities, and jurisdiction of the State Department of Mental Health, or a successor, as they relate to approval of facilities to provide the types of treatment described in subdivision (a).

(d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, provider representatives, substance use treatment representatives, patients’ rights advocates, disability rights advocates, and other relevant stakeholders, establish updated regulations for the purpose of developing designation requirements for facilities who are admitting and treating persons involuntarily pursuant to this part. At a minimum, the regulations shall include all of the following:

(1) Minimum substance use disorder related service requirements with sufficient substance use disorder staff to maintain appropriate substance use disorder only and cooccurring disorder programs, treatment setting, services, and safety measures, based on the individual patient’s substance use disorder needs.

(2) Standards for offering medications for addiction treatment (MAT) or an effective referral process in place with narcotic treatment programs, community health centers, or other MAT providers.

(3) Length of stay standards consistent with evidence-based care for substance use disorders.

(4) Discharge planning for substance use disorder services, consistent with existing requirements.

(5) Privacy and data sharing requirements, including, but not limited to, developing guidance and tools to facilitate data sharing for care coordination and discharge purposes.

(6) The process for transitioning and assisting designated facilities to meet updated regulatory requirements, including, but not limited
 to, providing substance use disorder services.

(7) Systems of public accountability and oversight that include, but are not limited to, readiness to meet, and ongoing maintenance of, required standards for staffing, facilities, and care established pursuant to this section.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of plan or county letters, information notices, plan or provider bulletins, or other similar instructions, until the time regulations are adopted no later than December 31, 2027.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 190.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5405.

(a) This section shall apply to each facility licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services, or its delegated agent, on or after January 1, 2003. For purposes of this section, “facility” means psychiatric health facilities, as defined in Section 1250.2 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 77001) of Division 5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, psychiatric residential treatment facilities, as defined in Section 1250.10 of the Health and Safety Code, licensed pursuant to Section 4081 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and mental health rehabilitation centers licensed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 781.00) of Division 1 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) (1) (A) Prior to the initial licensure or first renewal of a license on or after January 1, 2003, of any person to operate or manage a facility specified in subdivision (a), the applicant or licensee shall submit fingerprint images and related information pertaining to the applicant or licensee to the Department of Justice for purposes of a criminal record check, as specified in paragraph (2), at the expense of the applicant or licensee. The Department of Justice shall provide the results of the criminal record check to the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services may take into consideration information obtained from or provided by other government agencies. The State Department of Health Care Services shall determine whether the applicant or licensee has ever been convicted of a crime specified in subdivision (c). The applicant or licensee shall submit fingerprint images and related information each